Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.320

General or custodial receivership.

A court in a judicial proceeding brought under RCW 23B.14.300 may appoint one or more general receivers to wind up and liquidate the business and affairs of the corporation, or, if the corporation is not yet dissolved, may appoint one or more custodial receivers to manage its business and affairs. The court shall hold a hearing, after notifying all parties to the proceeding and any interested persons designated by the court, before appointing a general or custodial receiver. The hearing, and any resulting receivership, shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 7.60 RCW.

[ 2006 c 52 s 16; 2004 c 165 s 40; 1989 c 165 s 165.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.